Wisconsin, session 2025, AB785.
do enact as follows:AB785,11Section 1. 20.155 (3) (q) of the statutes is created to read:AB785,2,4220.155 (3) (q) Percentage of income payment program. From the energy 3burden relief fund, a sum sufficient to operate the percentage of income payment 4program under s. 196.93.AB785,25Section 2. 25.965 of the statutes is created to read:AB785,3,2625.965 Energy burden relief fund. There is established a separate 1nonlapsible trust fund designated as the energy burden relief fund, to consist of all 2moneys received under ss. 76.28 and 76.29.AB785,33Section 3. 71.78 (4) (w) of the statutes is created to read:AB785,3,5471.78 (4) (w) The public service commission in determining rates and 5financial assistance applicable to a customer under s. 196.93.AB785,46Section 4. 73.03 (78) of the statutes is created to read:AB785,3,9773.03 (78) To annually provide the public service commission with income 8data of individuals to enable the public service commission to determine rates and 9financial assistance applicable to a customer under s. 196.93.AB785,510Section 5. 196.37 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB785,3,1311196.37 (7) Rates or financial assistance applicable to a customer under the 12percentage of income payment program under s. 196.93 are not unreasonable or 13unjustly discriminatory.AB785,614Section 6. 196.60 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB785,3,1715196.60 (4) This section does not apply to a rates or financial assistance 16applicable to a customer under the percentage of income payment program under s. 17196.93.AB785,718Section 7. 196.604 of the statutes is renumbered 196.604 (1).AB785,819Section 8. 196.604 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB785,3,2220196.604 (2) This section does not apply to rates or financial assistance 21applicable to a customer under the percentage of income payment program under s. 22196.93.AB785,923Section 9. 196.93 of the statutes is created to read:AB785,4,21196.93 Percentage of income payment program. (1) Definitions. In 2this section:AB785,4,53(a) “Energy burdened household” means a household for which the monthly 4electricity and gas bills equal at least 2 percent and less than 4 percent of the total 5annual income of the household divided by 12.AB785,4,76(b) “Household” means a group of persons who pay for the same residential 7electric service, residential gas service, or both.AB785,4,88(c) “Severely energy burdened household” means any of the following:AB785,4,1091. A household for which the monthly electricity and gas bills equal 4 percent 10or more of the total annual income of the household divided by 12.AB785,4,12112. A household that has no annual income and that includes a customer who 12pays electricity bills or gas bills.AB785,4,1713(2) Percentage of income payment program. (a) The commission shall 14ensure, using the authority provided under this section, that the monthly cost of 15electricity and gas for a severely energy burdened household or energy burdened 16household does not exceed 2 percent of the annual income of the household divided 17by 12.AB785,4,2018(b) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, the commission may 19approve rates for electricity and gas service under this chapter in which the rate 20applicable to a customer is based on the customer’s household income.AB785,4,2221(c) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, the commission may 22provide financial assistance to satisfy the requirement under par. (a).AB785,5,323(d) 1. The commission shall prioritize exercising the authority under this 24section to benefit severely energy burdened households that are customers of 1investor-owned electric or gas public utilities and that have a gross annual income 2not exceeding 300 percent of the federal income poverty guidelines under 42 USC 39902 (2).AB785,5,542. The commission shall determine a formula for use in calculating household 5income for purposes of this section.AB785,5,863. The commission shall determine the applicability of rates and financial 7assistance for households under this section based on information provided by the 8department of revenue under s. 73.03 (78).AB785,5,129(3) Eligibility. (a) The commission may limit the applicability of rates or 10financial assistance provided under this section to only rates or financial assistance 11that reduces the financial obligation for electric service, gas service, or both, for a 12primary residence.AB785,5,1513(b) 1. The commission may establish maximum household electricity and gas 14consumption thresholds for the applicability of rates and financial assistance under 15this section.AB785,5,18162. A threshold established under subd. 1. may not be less than twice the 17median electricity or gas consumption, as applicable, for residential customers of 18each public utility.AB785,5,23193. If the commission establishes a threshold under subd. 1., the commission 20shall create an online process for a household to petition for an exemption from the 21thresholds established under subd. 1. The commission shall grant an exemption if 22it is necessary for the household to consume electricity or gas above the thresholds 23established under subd. 1. for reasonable residential purposes.AB785,6,424(4) Participation and outreach. (a) The commission shall automatically 1enroll all energy burdened households and severely energy burdened households in 2the program under this section. This section does not apply after the first day of the 337th month beginning after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts 4date].AB785,6,65(b) The commission shall create an online portal for persons to apply to 6become enrolled in the program under this section.AB785,6,97(c) The commission shall engage in active outreach about participating in the 8program under this section to communities that historically have had a relatively 9high proportion of severely energy burdened households.AB785,6,1110(5) Rules. The commission may promulgate rules to implement the 11percentage of income payment program under this section.AB785,6,1512(6) Annual report. Annually, no later than November 1, the commission 13shall submit to the governor and to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) a report on 14the administration of the percentage of income payment program under this 15section. The report shall include all of the following:AB785,6,1616(a) Updates on changes to the program and individuals served by program.AB785,6,1717(b) Financial reporting on the program.AB785,6,1818(c) Identification of any barriers to customer participation in the program.AB785,6,1919(d) Policy recommendations to the legislature.AB785,6,2220(7) Launch. No later than the first day of the 13th month beginning after the 21effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], the commission shall begin 22exercising authority under sub. (2) (b) or (c). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab785 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab785 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB785 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB785 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB785: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting